Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-110
State rock; prairie agate.

The chalcedony stone, commonly known as prairie agate, is hereby declared the state rock of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 610, § 1, p. 2058;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-727.